Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-14] Rules. The department of
public safety shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91, and shall
develop and periodically review and revise guidelines, directives, standards,
and protocols and shall take other actions as are necessary and appropriate, to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next